fr: Format de vente de l’entoilage: Au mètre (continu); À la verge (continu); Pièce prédécoupée; Formes/panneaux prédécoupés; Bandes prédécoupées; Rouleau; Échantillon; Autre
th: รูปแบบการขายผ้าซับใน: ขายเป็นเมตร (ต่อเนื่อง); ขายเป็นหลา (ต่อเนื่อง); ชิ้นตัดล่วงหน้า; รูปทรง/แผ่นตัดล่วงหน้า; แถบตัดล่วงหน้า; ม้วน; ชิ้นตัวอย่าง; อื่นๆ
en: Interfacing selling format: By the meter (continuous); By the yard (continuous); Pre-cut piece; Pre-cut shapes/panels; Pre-cut strips; Roll; Sample swatch; Other
hr-HR: Format prodaje putem sučelja: Na metre (kontinuirano); Na jarde (kontinuirano); Unaprijed izrezani komad; Unaprijed izrezani oblici/ploče; Unaprijed izrezane trake; Rola; Uzorak; Ostalo
vi: Hình thức bán vải lót: Theo mét (cắt liền); Theo yard (cắt liền); Mảnh cắt sẵn; Mảnh/khung cắt sẵn; Dải cắt sẵn; Cuộn; Mẫu vải; Khác
es: Formato de venta de la interfaz: Por metro (continuo); Por yarda (continuo); Pieza precortada; Formas/paneles precortados; Tiras precortadas; Rollo; Muestra de tejido; Otro
zh-CN: 粘合衬销售形式: 按米（连续）; 按码（连续）; 预裁片; 预裁形状/裁片; 预裁条; 卷装; 样品样本; 其他
da: Salgstype for mellemfor: Pr. meter (sammenhængende); Pr. yard (sammenhængende); Forskåret stykke; Forskårne former/paneler; Forskårne strimler; Rulle; Stofprøve; Andet
nl: Vlieseline verkoopformaat: Per meter (aaneengesloten); Per yard (aaneengesloten); Voorgesneden stuk; Voorgesneden vormen/panelen; Voorgesneden stroken; Rol; Voorbeeldstaal; Overig
zh-TW: 襯布銷售形式: 依公尺計 (連續); 依碼計 (連續); 預先裁切塊; 預先裁切形狀/布片; 預先裁切長條; 捲狀; 樣布/色樣; 其他
sl-SI: Format prodaje medvloge: Na meter (v enem kosu); Na jard (v enem kosu); Vnaprej odrezan kos; Vnaprej izrezane oblike/plošče; Vnaprej odrezani trakovi; Rola; Vzorec; Drugo
hu: Közbélés értékesítési formája: Méterre (folyamatos); Yardra (folyamatos); Előre vágott darab; Előre vágott formák/panelek; Előre vágott csíkok; Tekercs; Mintadarab; Egyéb
ru: Формат продажи прокладочного материала: На метраж (цельным куском); На ярды (цельным куском); Отрез; Готовые формы/панели; Готовые полосы; Рулон; Образец; Другое
ro-RO: Format de vânzare de interfață: La metru (continuu); La yard (continuu); Bucată pretăiată; Forme/panouri pretăiate; Benzi pretăiate; Rolă; Mostră; Altele
sv: Försäljningsformat för mellanlägg: Metervara (löpande); Per yard (löpande); Färdigklippt bit; Färdigklippta former/paneler; Färdigklippta remsor; Rulle; Provbit; Annat
lt-LT: Paklijavimo medžiagos pardavimo formatas: Metrais (ištisinis); Jardais (ištisinis); Iš anksto atkirptas gabalas; Iš anksto iškirptos formos / plokštės; Iš anksto atkirptos juostelės; Rulonas; Pavyzdys; Kita
cs: Propojovací prodejní formát: Na metry (vcelku); Na yardy (vcelku); Předem ustřižený kus; Předem vyřezané tvary / panely; Předem nastříhané proužky; Role; Vzorek ze vzorníku; Jiné
sk-SK: Sprievodný formát podšívky: Na metre (vcelku); Na yardy (vcelku); Vopred nastrihaný kus; Vopred nastrihané tvary/panely; Vopred nastrihané pásy; Rolka; Vzorka; Iné
ko: 심지 판매 형식: 미터 단위(연속); 야드 단위(연속); 사전 재단 조각; 사전 재단 도형/패널; 사전 재단 스트립; 롤; 샘플 견본; 기타
pl: Format sprzedaży interfejsowej: Na metry (w jednym kawałku); Na jardy (w jednym kawałku); Wstępnie docięty kawałek; Wstępnie docięte kształty/panele; Wstępnie docięte paski; Rolka; Próbka materiału; Inny
nb: Salgsformat for grensesnitt: Som metervare (kontinuerlig); Per yard (kontinuerlig); Ferdigklippet stykke; Ferdigkuttede former/paneler; Ferdigkuttede strimler; Rull; Prøvelapp; Annet
de: Verkaufsformat der Einlage: Meterware (endlos); Yardware (endlos); Zuschnitt; Vorgeschnittene Formen/Paneele; Vorgeschnittene Streifen; Rolle; Stoffmuster; Sonstige
fi: Tukikankaan myyntimuoto: Metreittäin (jatkuva); Jaardeittain (jatkuva); Valmiiksi leikattu pala; Valmiiksi leikatut muodot/paneelit; Valmiiksi leikatut suikaleet; Rulla; Mallitilkku; Muu
el: Μορφή πώλησης ενισχυτικού υφάσματος: Με το μέτρο (συνεχόμενο); Με τη γιάρδα (συνεχόμενο); Προκομμένο κομμάτι; Προκομμένα σχήματα/πάνελ; Προκομμένες λωρίδες; Ρολό; Δείγμα; Άλλο
bg-BG: Формат на продажба на подлепващия материал: На метър (непрекъснато); На ярд (непрекъснато); Предварително изрязано парче; Предварително изрязани форми/панели; Предварително изрязани ленти; Ролка; Мостра; Други
tr: Arayüz satış formatı: Metreyle (kesintisiz); Yardayla (kesintisiz); Önceden kesilmiş parça; Önceden kesilmiş şekiller/paneller; Önceden kesilmiş şeritler; Rulo; Örnek numune; Diğer
pt-BR: Entretela formato de venda: Por metro (contínuo); Por jarda (contínuo); Peça pré-cortada; Formatos/painéis pré-cortados; Tiras pré-cortadas; Rolo; Amostra de tecido; Outro
ja: インターフェース販売フォーマット: メートル売り（連続）; ヤード売り（連続）; カット済みピース; カット済み形状/パネル; カット済みストリップ; ロール; サンプル見本; その他
pt-PT: Formato de venda da entretela: A metro (contínuo); A jarda (contínuo); Peça pré-cortada; Formas/painéis pré-cortados; Tiras pré-cortadas; Rolo; Paleta de amostras; Outro
it: Formato di vendita dell'interfodera: Al metro (continuo); Alla iarda (continuo); Pezzo pretagliato; Forme/pannelli pretagliati; Strisce pretagliate; Rotolo; Campione di tessuto; Altro